Tennessee, session 114, HB0764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4204(a), is amended by adding
the following to the end of the subsection:
A search conducted pursuant to this subsection (a) may only be conducted by a
school resource officer who is acting, for the purpose of the search, as a school
official.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4204, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(e) This section does not authorize a search that violates the fourth amendment
to the United States Constitution or the Constitution of Tennessee, Article I, § 7.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4205(a), is amended by adding
the following to the end of the subsection:
A searched conducted pursuant to this subsection (a) may only be conducted by
a school resource officer who is acting, for the purpose of the search, as a school
official. If a student is under eighteen (18) years of age, then the principal must
notify the student's parent or legal guardian of the need to conduct a physical
search of the student and receive the consent of the student's parent or legal
guardian to conduct the search.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4205, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
HB0764
001024
- 1 -

(c) This section does not authorize a search that violates the fourth amendment
to the United States Constitution or the Constitution of Tennessee, Article I, § 7.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001024